Wisconsin, session 2025, SB481.
do enact as follows:SB481,11Section 1. 234.661 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB481,2,22234.661 (1) (am) “Condominium” has the meaning given in s. 703.02 (4).SB481,23Section 2. 234.661 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB481,2,54234.661 (1) (cm) “Grant project” means a project for the conversion of 5multifamily housing to condominiums.SB481,36Section 3. 234.661 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB481,2,137234.661 (2) (a) (intro.) There is established under the jurisdiction and control 8of the authority a main street housing rehabilitation revolving loan fund, for the 9purpose of providing loans under sub. (3) and awarding grants under sub. (3g). The 10authority may use moneys in the fund to cover actual and necessary expenses, 11including marketing expenses under sub. (4), incurred to accomplish the purposes 12of this section and administer the fund. The fund shall consist of all of the 13following:SB481,414Section 4. 234.661 (3g) of the statutes is created to read:SB481,2,1815234.661 (3g) Condominium conversion reimbursement grants. (a) The 16authority shall establish and administer a condominium conversion 17reimbursement grant program for the purpose of awarding grants under this 18subsection.SB481,3,21(b) The authority shall award grants to owners of multifamily housing for the 2costs associated with a grant project, including any of the following:SB481,3,331. Reasonable attorney fees.SB481,3,442. State and local permitting fees.SB481,3,553. Any other cost incurred for the grant project.SB481,3,76(c) The authority may direct up to $10,000,000 from the main street housing 7rehabilitation revolving loan fund for grants under this subsection.SB481,3,98(d) The total amount awarded in grants under this subsection for a single 9parcel of land may not exceed $50,000.SB481,510Section 5. 234.661 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB481,3,1211234.661 (4) Marketing. The authority shall establish and administer a 12marketing program to advertise the loans and grants available under this section.SB481,613Section 6. 234.661 (5) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB481,3,1514234.661 (5) (bm) Information concerning each grant awarded under sub. (3g), 15including all of the following:SB481,3,16161. The date and amount of the grant.SB481,3,18172. An identification of the owner of the multifamily housing receiving the 18grant.SB481,3,19193. A description of the grant project.SB481,3,21204. An identification of the city, village, town, or county having jurisdiction 21over the grant project for which the grant was awarded.SB481,722Section 7. 234.661 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB481,4,223234.661 (5) (c) The number of dwelling units rehabilitated or converted to 1date as a result of the loan program and grant program under this section and the 2locations and sale or estimated sale or rental prices of the dwelling units.SB481,83Section 8. Initial applicability.SB481,4,54(1) The treatment of s. 234.661 (5) (bm) and (c) first applies to a report made 5on August 2, 2026.SB481,4,66